Hawaii statutes.
§603-16 Continuance of hearing or trial.
If the judge of any circuit court, or any other circuit judge authorized to
preside in the circuit, fails to attend any trial or hearing at the time
appointed, a clerk thereof shall continue any case or matter then before the
court for trial or hearing, from time to time, until the attendance of one of
the circuit judges; but no such continuance shall be for a longer period than
seven days, except as otherwise ordered by the court. [L 1892, c 57, §46; RL
1925, §2255; RL 1935, §3652; RL 1945, §9644; am L 1947, c 220, §1; RL 1955,
§215-14; HRS §603-16; am L 1972, c 88, §3(h)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next